Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1219
Obtaining a permit through false representation; penalty.

(1) Any person who knowingly withholds information or makes any false, fictitious, or misrepresented statement or furnishes or exhibits any false, fictitious, or misrepresented identification for the purpose of obtaining a permit or relief from disability under the provisions of sections 28-1213 to 28-1239 or knowingly makes any false entry in a record which such person is required to keep pursuant to such sections or the regulations promulgated pursuant to such sections, commits the offense of obtaining a permit through false representations.

(2) Obtaining a permit through false representations is a Class IV felony.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 251.